Washington statutes.
RCW 26.34.040

"Appropriate authority of the receiving state" defined.

As used in paragraph (a) of Article V of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, the phrase "appropriate authority in the receiving state" with reference to this state shall mean the department of children, youth, and families.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 331; 1971 ex.s. c 168 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.